Hawaii statutes.
§9-15 Contracts. (a) The foundation
shall not release the public funds approved for a foundation grant unless a
contract is entered into between the foundation and the recipient of the
grant. The foundation shall develop and determine, in consultation with and
subject to the review and approval of the attorney general, the specific
contract form to be used.

(b) Payment of funds shall be made within
sixty days after a contract is executed. Contracts shall be executed in
accordance with the foundation's rules adopted pursuant to section 9-5 and no
later than ninety days after receipt of a foundation-approved revised service
proposal or foundation-approved certification that there have been no
programmatic or budgetary changes to the application.

(c) All contracts shall be reviewed by the
attorney general for conformance with this part. [L 1992, c 181, pt of
§1; am L 1993, c 6, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next